pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Acessórios para aparelhos para levantamento de peso > Pesos: Placas adaptadoras para bateria de pesos; Kits de expansão de bateria de pesos
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Sunkiosios atletikos treniruoklių ir treniruočių suoliukų priedai > Svarsčiai: Svorių blokų adapterinės plokštės; Svorių blokų atnaujinimo rinkiniai
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Weight Lifting Machine & Exercise Bench Accessories > Weights: Weight Stack Adapter Plates; Weight Stack Upgrade Kits
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Stroji za dvigovanje uteži in dodatki za klopi za vadbo > Uteži: Adapterske plošče za sklad uteži; Kompleti za nadgradnjo sklada uteži
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Phụ kiện giàn & ghế tập tạ > Trọng lượng: Tấm điều chỉnh tạ khối; Bộ nâng cấp tạ khối
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Аксессуары для силовых тренажеров и тренировочных скамей > Грузы: Пластины-переходники для весовых стеков; Комплекты для увеличения веса стека
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Ağırlık Kaldırma Makinesi ve Egzersiz Sehpası Aksesuarları > Ağırlıklar: Ağırlık bloğu adaptör plakaları; Ağırlık bloğu yükseltme kitleri
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Vægtløftningsmaskiner – tilbehør > Vægte: Adapterplader til vægtmagasiner; Opgraderingssæt til vægtmagasiner
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Аксесоари за силови уреди и фитнес лежанки > Тежести: Адаптерни плочи за тежестни; Комплекти за надграждане на тежести
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > อุปกรณ์เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและม้านั่งออกกำลังกาย > ตุ้มน้ำหนัก: แผ่นอะแดปเตอร์แผ่นน้ำหนักแบบเรียงซ้อน; ชุดอัปเกรดแผ่นน้ำหนักแบบเรียงซ้อน
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > ウェイトリフティングマシン関連用品 > ウェイト: ウェイトスタックアダプタープレート; ウェイトスタックアップグレードキット
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Tillbehör till styrketräningsmaskiner och -bänkar > Vikter: Adapterplattor för viktmagasin; Uppgraderingssatser för viktmagasin
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Acessórios para banco de exercício e máquina de halterofilismo > Pesos: Placas adaptadoras de blocos de peso; Kits de melhoria de blocos de peso
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 重量訓練機/臥推椅配件 > 配重: 槓片轉接板; 槓片升級套件
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Accessoires pour machines et bancs d’haltérophilie > Poids: Plaques d’adaptation pour colonne de poids; Kits d’extension de colonne de poids
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Accesorios para máquinas de levantamiento de pesas y bancos de ejercicio > Pesas: Placas adaptadoras para pilas de pesas; Kits de mejora para pilas de pesas
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Sprava za dizanje utega i pribor za klupu za vježbanje > Utezi: Ploče za prilagodbu težine utega; Kompleti za nadogradnju utega
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Painonnostolaitteiden ja kuntosalipenkkien lisätarvikkeet > Painot: Painopakan adapterilevyt; Painopakan päivityssarjat
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Accessoires voor krachtapparatuur en fitnessbanken > Gewichten: Gewichtstapeladapterplaten; Gewichtstapel-upgradekits
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 力量训练器械配件 > 重量器械: 配重块转接板; 配重块升级套件
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Zubehör für Krafttrainingsgeräte > Gewichte: Steckgewichte-Adapterplatten; Steckgewichte-Erweiterungssets
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Příslušenství ke vzpěracím trenažérům a lavicím > Činky: Adaptéry na zátěžové sloupce; Rozšiřující sady závaží
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Accessori per panche e macchine per sollevamento pesi > Pesi: Piastre adattatrici per pacco pesi; Kit di aggiornamento pacco pesi
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Súlyemelő gépek és edzőpad-kiegészítők > Súlyok: Súlyblokk adaptertárcsák; Súlyblokkbővítő készletek
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 역기 운동 기구/벤치 부대용품 > 무게추: 웨이트 스택 어댑터 플레이트; 웨이트 스택 업그레이드 키트
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Αξεσουάρ για μηχανήματα άρσης βαρών & πάγκους άσκησης > Βάρη: Πλάκες προσαρμογής στοίβας βαρών; Κιτ αναβάθμισης στοίβας βαρών
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Príslušenstvo k vzpieračským strojom a lavičkám > Závažia: Adaptérové dosky na závažia; Súpravy na rozšírenie záťažových blokov
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Akcesoria do atlasów i ławek treningowych > Ciężarki: Płyty adaptacyjne do stosów obciążeń; Zestawy do rozbudowy stosów obciążeń
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Tilbehør til vektløftingsmaskiner og treningsbenker > Vekter: Adapterplater for vektmagasiner; Oppgraderingssett for vektmagasiner
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Accesorii pentru aparate pentru ridicat greutăți și bănci de fitness > Greutăți: Plăci adaptoare pentru stiva de greutăți; Kituri de upgrade pentru stiva de greutăți